Georgia statutes. TITLE 3 Alcoholic Beverages
Editor’s notes.

In light of the similarity of the statutory provisions, annotations decided under former Ga. L. 1937-38, Ex. Sess. p. 103 are included in the annotations for this title.

Cross references.

Hospitalization, treatment, and care of alcoholics, T. 37, C. 7.

Criminal penalty for suspension of driver’s license for driving under influence of alcohol, §§

40-5-54

,

40-6-391

.

Law reviews.

For note discussing the twenty-first amendment’s limitation on state’s power to regulate alcoholic beverages, in light of United States v. State Tax Comm’n, 412 U.S. 363,

93 S. Ct. 2183

,

37 L. Ed. 2

d 1 (1973), see 10 Ga. St. B. J. 336 (1973).